test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-AN-pahkwesikan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - pahkwêsikan - ok : # -m animate noun, bannock, Grammar guide p. 27
     
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg: pahkwêsikan
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl: pahkwêsikanak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Loc: pahkwêsikanihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Obv: pahkwêsikana
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [pahkwêsikanis, pahkwêsikanisis]
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [pahkwêsikanisak, pahkwêsikanisisak]
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [pahkwêsikanisihk, pahkwêsikanisisihk]

     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nipahkwêsikanim
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kipahkwêsikanim
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanima
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanimiyiwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nipahkwêsikaniminân
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kipahkwêsikaniminaw
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kipahkwêsikanimiwâw
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimiwâwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimiyiwa

     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nipahkwêsikanimak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kipahkwêsikanimak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanima
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanimiyiwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nipahkwêsikaniminânak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kipahkwêsikaniminawak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kipahkwêsikanimiwâwak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimiwâwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimiyiwa

     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nipahkwêsikanimis
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kipahkwêsikanimis
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanimisa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanimisiyiwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nipahkwêsikanimisinân
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kipahkwêsikanimisinaw
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kipahkwêsikanimisiwâw
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimisiwâwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimisiyiwa

     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nipahkwêsikanimisak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kipahkwêsikanimisak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanimisa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanimisiyiwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nipahkwêsikanimisinânak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kipahkwêsikanimisinawak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kipahkwêsikanimisiwâwak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimisiwâwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimisiyiwa

     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nipahkwêsikanimihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kipahkwêsikanimihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: opahkwêsikanimihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: opahkwêsikanimiyihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nipahkwêsikaniminâhk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kipahkwêsikaniminâhk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kipahkwêsikanimiwâhk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: opahkwêsikanimiwâhk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: opahkwêsikanimiyihk

     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nipahkwêsikanimisihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kipahkwêsikanimisihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: opahkwêsikanimisihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: opahkwêsikanimisiyihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nipahkwêsikanimisinâhk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kipahkwêsikanimisinâhk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kipahkwêsikanimisiwâhk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: opahkwêsikanimisiwâhk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: opahkwêsikanimisiyihk
